Arkansas statutes. Title 10 General Assembly
Chapter 4 Legislative Audit
10-4-425. Format of private audit reports.

To provide for a consistent and understandable financial format, all financial audit reports prepared by certified public accountants in private practice or public accountants of entities of the state or political subdivisions of the state shall be in substantially the same form as reports prepared by the Legislative Auditor for a similar governmental entity.

(1)The audit reports shall present the financial information and comments in a similar format as audit reports of the Legislative Auditor.

The reports shall include coverage of all applicable laws that relate to the operation of the governmental unit, including coverage of purchasing, bonding, revenue, and expenditures with comments on any apparent violation of applicable state or local legislative acts, codes, rules, or regulations.

(1)The Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall develop a system that allows an auditor in private practice to present a proposed format for preparing a given audit report on one (1) of the named governmental units for the review of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee.

If the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee finds that the audit report format is similar to the audit reports prepared by the Legislative Auditor, then the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall approve the format of the audit on the named governmental units.

If the private auditor's format does not meet the approval of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, then the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee may authorize and direct that the audit shall be conducted by the staff of the Legislative Auditor.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 7; 2019, No. 315, § 752.

10-4-426. Continuing professional education courses.

In addition to contracting with private entities, Arkansas Legislative Audit may contract and pay entities of the state or political subdivisions of the state or any of their part-time or full-time employees for services rendered or for materials, supplies, or other expenses incurred in conducting continuing professional education courses for the staff of Arkansas Legislative Audit.

Any funds received by public employees under this section shall be considered supplemental to their regular salaried positions and shall not be subject to the restrictions of §6-63-307, §19-4-1604, or other statutory salary limitations regarding line item maximums or grades and steps.

This section applies whether the public employee is paid directly or indirectly by an entity of the state or a political subdivision of the state.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 7; 2015, No. 554, § 24.

10-4-427. Claims against sureties.

With the approval of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, the Legislative Auditor shall give notice and make proof of loss to and demand payment of the surety on any bond covering an official or employee in which the audit report of the records of that official or employee reflects any shortage or other liability for which that official or employee and his or her surety may in any way be liable.

(1)Within a reasonable time after the Legislative Auditor has given notice and made proof of loss and demand for payment as stated in subsection (a) of this section, the surety shall make payment of the amounts found to be due in the name of the appropriate entity and forward the payment to the entity.

Upon receipt of payment from the surety, the entity shall credit the amounts received to the accounts entitled to the funds.

The requirements of the self-insured fidelity bond program, §21-2-701 et seq., shall apply to those officials or employees covered by the program, including, but not limited to, the provision for timing of coverage determinations by the Governmental Bonding Board under §21-2-709.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 7;
2017, No. 391, § 1.

10-4-428. Employment of outside legal counsel.

Arkansas Legislative Audit may employ outside legal counsel as deemed necessary by the Legislative Auditor after receiving prior approval of the executive committee of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee.

If the executive committee of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee approves the employment of outside legal counsel by Arkansas Legislative Audit, no additional approval is required.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 736, § 6.

Subchapter 2

— Local Audits